Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1089.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 70APERMITTED USE OF PUBLIC SPACESec.70A01. Definitions.70A02. Permitted use of public space.70A03. Affirmative defense.70A04. Enforcement.§ 70A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 123456789101112131415161718 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adequate alternative indoor space." A space that is legally and physically accessible to an individual and that does not require the individual to sacrifice any other personal right afforded to them under Federal, State or local law. All of the following shall apply:(1) An adequate alternative indoor space must satisfy all of the following:(i) Be available indefinitely to the individual without requiring daily reapplication.(ii) Be free of charge.(iii) Accommodate any disabilities.(iv) Accept pets.(v) Accommodate partners, whether the partners are legally married or not, family members or other support individuals.(vi) Accommodate the individual's personal property.(2) A tiny home or similar structure may be an adequate alternative indoor space if the tiny home or similar structure is climate-controlled, as appropriate to the local climate conditions, and possesses all of the following:(i) Locking doors.(ii) Individual sanitary and cooking facilities or common facilities sufficient to meet the needs of the tiny home community.(3) An adequate alternative indoor space in a neighboring municipal corporation is presumptively inaccessible unless adequate transportation is available at no cost to the individual to ensure that the individual can 20250SB1089PN1313 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attend to any personal or professional business in the municipal corporation of origin."Individual experiencing homelessness." An individual lacking a fixed, regular and adequate nighttime residence, including any of the following:(1) Individuals sharing the housing of other individuals due to loss of housing, economic hardship or a similar reason.(2) Individuals living in motels, hotels, trailer parks or camping grounds due to the lack of alternative adequate accommodations.(3) Individuals living in emergency or transitional shelters.(4) Individuals abandoned in hospitals.(5) Individuals awaiting foster care placement.(6) Individuals living in a private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings within the meaning of 42 U.S.C. § 11302(a)(2) (relating to general definition of homeless individual).(7) Individuals living in cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing, bus or train stations or similar settings.(8) Individuals who meet the definition of "homeless children and youths" as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 11434a(2) (relating to definitions), regardless of whether an individual is a child or youth."Life-sustaining activity." Moving, resting, sitting, standing, lying down, sleeping, protecting oneself from the natural elements, eating, drinking and storing personal property as needed to safely shelter oneself.20250SB1089PN1313 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Municipal corporation." As defined in 8 Pa.C.S. § 101.1 (relating to definitions)."Public space." Any property that is owned or leased, in whole or in part, by the Commonwealth or a municipality or any property upon which there is an easement for public use and that is held open to the public, or any Federal land that is open to the public, where State or local law enforcement has jurisdiction to enforce State or local laws, including plazas, courtyards, parking lots, sidewalks, public transportation facilities and services, public buildings, shopping centers, underpasses and lands adjacent to roadways and parks."Recreational vehicle." A travel trailer, camping trailer, park trailer, camper, camper motor home or similar accommodation that is primarily designed as temporary living quarters for recreational camping or for seasonal or travel use and either has its own motor power or is mounted on or drawn by another vehicle.§ 70A02. Permitted use of public space.(a) Public spaces.--An individual experiencing homelessness may use public spaces for life-sustaining activities if the activities do not obstruct a public walkway or public street in a manner that pedestrians or vehicles cannot pass, unless sufficient adequate alternative indoor space is available to the individual experiencing homelessness in a municipal corporation and has been offered to the individual, including transportation for the individual and the individual's belongings.(b) Private property.--An individual experiencing homelessness may use private property for life-sustaining activities with the verbal or written permission of the property owner, unless sufficient adequate alternative indoor space is 20250SB1089PN1313 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 available to the individual experiencing homelessness in a municipal corporation and has been offered to the individual, including transportation for the individual and the individual's belongings.(c) Civil and criminal penalties.--An individual experiencing homelessness shall not receive or be charged with a civil or criminal penalty or violation of soliciting, sharing, accepting or offering food, water, money or other donations in public spaces if the individual does not obstruct a public walkway or public street in a manner that pedestrians or vehicles cannot pass.(d) Personal property protections.--An individual experiencing homelessness shall receive the same degree of protection for personal property stored in public spaces as personal property stored in a private dwelling, including protection against unreasonable search and seizure.(e) Vehicles.--(1) An individual experiencing homelessness shall not be required to move a motor vehicle or a recreational vehicle if the vehicle is parked on public property and the vehicle is not parked in a position that obstructs the flow of traffic. An individual experiencing homelessness shall not be required to move a motor vehicle or a recreational vehicle that is on private property with the permission of the private property owner.(2) If a motor vehicle or recreational vehicle must be moved because the vehicle is obstructing the flow of traffic, the individual experiencing homelessness shall be permitted to relocate the vehicle before a parking ticket is issued or the vehicle is towed. The individual experiencing 20250SB1089PN1313 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 homelessness shall be permitted to retrieve items from a towed vehicle and to retrieve the vehicle from storage free of charge or at a reduced rate upon consideration of ability to pay.§ 70A03. Affirmative defense.(a) Defense.--It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge of violating a statute or ordinance criminalizing life-sustaining activity permitted under section 70A02 (relating to permitted use of public space) that the individual experiencing homelessness had no access to an adequate alternative indoor space in which to undertake the prohibited conduct.(b) Court notice.--The trial court shall notify the charged individual of the availability of the defense under subsection (a) and how to raise the defense.(c) Rebuttable presumption and burden.--Once the defense is raised, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that adequate alternative indoor space did not exist, and the burden shall be on the prosecutor to prove the availability of an adequate alternative indoor space.§ 70A04. Enforcement.(a) Attorney General.--The Attorney General shall have authority to bring a civil action on behalf of the Commonwealth against any State or local government or government official that violates, or implements or enforces a rule, ordinance, regulation, law, policy or practice that violates, this chapter. The court shall hold unlawful and set aside the rule, ordinance, regulation, law, policy or practice if it is in violation of this chapter.(b) Private right of action.--An individual or organization adversely affected by a violation of this chapter may commence a 20250SB1089PN1313 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 civil action against any State or local government or government official that violates, or implements or enforces a rule, ordinance, regulation, law, policy or practice that violates, this chapter. The court shall hold unlawful and set aside the rule, ordinance, regulation, law, policy or practice if it is in violation of this chapter.(c) Equitable relief.--In any action under this section, the court may award appropriate equitable relief, including temporary, preliminary or permanent injunctive relief.(d) Costs.--In any action under this section, the court shall award costs of litigation, as well as reasonable attorney fees, to a prevailing plaintiff. A plaintiff shall not be liable to a defendant for costs or attorney fees in any nonfrivolous action under this section.(e) Jurisdiction.--Commonwealth Court shall have original jurisdiction over proceedings under this section. Commonwealth Court shall exercise its jurisdiction without regard to whether the aggrieved party has exhausted all administrative or other remedies that may be provided by law.Section 2. Section 8522(b) of Title 42 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 8522. Exceptions to sovereign immunity.* * *(b) Acts which may impose liability.--The following acts by a Commonwealth party may result in the imposition of liability on the Commonwealth and the defense of sovereign immunity shall not be raised to claims for damages caused by:* * *(11) Permitted use of public space.-- The implementation or enforcement of a rule, ordinance, regulation, law, policy 20250SB1089PN1313 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or practice that violates Chapter 70A (relating to permitted use of public space).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1089PN1313 - 8 - 123